Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1107.02
Expanded function dental hygienist, defined.

Expanded function dental hygienist means a licensed dental hygienist who has met the requirements to practice as an expanded function dental hygienist pursuant to section 38-1118.01.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 8.